Utah statutes.
17-27a-514.   Regulation of amateur radio antennas.

(1)  A county may not enact or enforce an ordinance that does not comply with the ruling of the Federal Communications Commission in "Amateur Radio Preemption, 101 FCC 2nd 952 (1985)" or a regulation related to amateur radio service adopted under 47 C.F.R. Part 97.

(2)  If a county adopts an ordinance involving the placement, screening, or height of an amateur radio antenna based on health, safety, or aesthetic conditions, the ordinance shall:

(a)  reasonably accommodate amateur radio communications; and

(b)  represent the minimal practicable regulation to accomplish the county's purpose.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

